Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 5. Power Development Revolving Loan Fund.

Sec. 44.83.500.
Creation of fund. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 44.83.510.
Powers and duties of authority in administering the fund.

Repayment of a loan from the former power development revolving loan fund must be made with the proceeds from the sale of power from projects in the former energy program for Alaska.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

History.

(E.O. No. 75 § 4 (1989); am §§ 19, 28 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 11 ch 60 SLA 2000)

Sec. 44.83.520.
Loan terms. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 44.83.525.
Rate reopeners. [Repealed, § 13 ch 60 SLA 2000.]

Sec. 44.83.530.
Definitions.

In AS

44.83.500

—

44.83.530

,

“fund” means the former power development revolving loan fund; and

“power project” means a project acquired or constructed under the former energy program for Alaska, AS

44.83.380

—

44.83.425

.

History.

(E.O. No. 75 § 4 (1989); am § 20 ch 18 SLA 1993)

Secs. 44.83.600 — 44.83.650.
Bulk fuel revolving loan fund. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993. For present law, see AS 42.45.250 — 42.45.299.]